test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saeppli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - säʹppli: # Noun a-stem 'mouse/hiiri' - full paradigm
     säʹppli+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: säʹppli
     säʹppli+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: säʹpplee
     säʹppli+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: säʹpplee
     säʹppli+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: säʹppleeja
     säʹppli+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: säʹppleeʹst
     säʹppli+N+Sg+Com+Indef: säʹppleein
     säʹppli+N+Ess+Indef: säʹppleejen
     säʹppli+N+Par+Indef: säʹppleejed
     säʹppli+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [säʹppleetaa, säʹppleetää]
     säʹppli+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: säʹpplee
     säʹppli+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: säʹppleei
     säʹppli+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: säʹppleeid
     säʹppli+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: säʹppleeid
     säʹppli+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: säʹppleein
     säʹppli+N+Pl+Com+Indef: säʹppleeivuiʹm
     säʹppli+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [säʹppleeitaa, säʹppleeitää]

     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: säʹppleejaž
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: säʹppleeja
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: säʹppleeja
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: säʹppleejiʹžže
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: säʹppleejast
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com+Indef: säʹppleejain
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Ess+Indef: säʹppleejiʹžžen
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Par+Indef: säʹppleejiʹžžed
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [säʹppleejataa, säʹppleejatää]
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: säʹppleeja
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: säʹppleejai
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: säʹppleejaid
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: säʹppleejaid
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: säʹppleejain
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com+Indef: säʹppleejaivuiʹm
     säʹppli+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [säʹppleejaitaa, säʹppleejaitää]
